Illinois, session 104th, SB2069.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Paid Leave for All Workers Act is amended by 5changing Sections 10 and 15 and by adding Section 40 as 6follows: 7    (820 ILCS 192/10)8    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Construction industry" means any constructing, altering, 10reconstructing, repairing, rehabilitating, refinishing, 11refurbishing, remodeling, remediating, renovating, custom 12fabricating, maintenance, landscaping, improving, wrecking, 13painting, decorating, demolishing, or adding to or subtracting 14from any building, structure, highway, roadway, street, 15bridge, alley, sewer, ditch, sewage disposal plant, 16waterworks, parking facility, railroad, excavation or other 17structure, project, development, real property, or 18improvement, or to do any part thereof, whether or not the 19performance of the work herein described involves the addition 20to or fabrication into, any structure, project, development, 21real property, or improvement herein described of any material 22or article of merchandise.23    "Construction industry" also includes moving construction   SB2069- 2 -LRB104 10276 SPS 20350 b1related materials on the job site or to or from the job site, 2snow plowing, snow removal, and refuse collection.3    "Department" means the Illinois Department of Labor.4    "Domestic work" and "domestic worker" have the same 5meanings as defined in Section 10 of the Domestic Workers' 6Bill of Rights Act, except that "domestic worker" also 7includes independent contractors, sole proprietors, and 8partnerships.9    "Employee" has the same application and meaning as that 10provided in Sections 1 and 2 of the Illinois Wage Payment and 11Collection Act. "Employee" also includes all domestic workers, 12and, for the purposes of this Act, domestic workers shall not 13be excluded as employees under the provisions of item (1), 14(2), or (3) of Section 2 of the Illinois Wage Payment and 15Collection Act. "Employee" does not include: 16        (1) an employee as defined in the federal Railroad 17    Unemployment Insurance Act (45 U.S.C. 351 et seq.) or the 18    Railway Labor Act; 19        (2) a student enrolled in and regularly attending 20    classes in a college or university that is also the 21    student's employer, and who is employed on a temporary 22    basis at less than full time at the college or university, 23    but this exclusion applies only to work performed for that 24    college or university; or25        (3) a short-term employee who is employed by an 26    institution of higher education for less than 2   SB2069- 3 -LRB104 10276 SPS 20350 b1    consecutive calendar quarters during a calendar year and 2    who does not have a reasonable expectation that they will 3    be rehired by the same employer of the same service in a 4    subsequent calendar year. 5    "Employer" has the same application and meaning as that 6provided in Sections 1 and 2 of the Illinois Wage Payment and 7Collection Act, except that for purposes of this Act, 8"employer" also means the State and units of local government, 9any political subdivision of the State or units of local 10government, or any State or local government agency. 11    "Employer" does not include school districts organized 12under the School Code or park districts organized under the 13Park District Code. 14    "First responder" means a law enforcement officer, 15firefighter, emergency medical services personnel as defined 16in Section 3.5 of the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems 17Act, or public safety telecommunicator as defined in Section 2 18of the Emergency Telephone Systems Act.19    "Public safety agency" means any unit of local government 20or special purpose district within the State which has 21authority to provide firefighting, police, or other emergency 22services. 23    "Writing" or "written" means a printed or printable 24communication in physical or electronic format, including a 25communication that is transmitted through electronic mail, 26text message, or a computer system or is otherwise sent or   SB2069- 4 -LRB104 10276 SPS 20350 b1stored electronically.2(Source: P.A. 102-1143, eff. 1-1-24.) 3    (820 ILCS 192/15)4    Sec. 15. Provision of paid leave. 5    (a) Except as provided under Section 40, an An employee 6who works in Illinois is entitled to earn and use up to a 7minimum of 40 hours of paid leave during a 12-month period or a 8pro rata number of hours of paid leave under the provisions of 9subsection (b). The paid leave may be used by the employee for 10any purpose as long as the paid leave is taken in accordance 11with the provisions of this Act.12    (b) Paid leave under this Act shall accrue at the rate of 13one hour of paid leave for every 40 hours worked up to a 14minimum of 40 hours of paid leave or such greater amount if the 15employer provides more than 40 hours. Employees who are exempt 16from the overtime requirements of the federal Fair Labor 17Standards Act (29 U.S.C. 213(a)(1)) shall be deemed to work 40 18hours in each workweek for purposes of paid leave accrual 19unless their regular workweek is less than 40 hours, in which 20case paid leave accrues based on that regular workweek. 21Employees shall determine how much paid leave they need to 22use; , however, employers may set a reasonable minimum 23increment for the use of paid leave not to exceed 2 hours per 24day. If an employee's scheduled workday is less than 2 hours 25per day, the employee's scheduled workday shall be used to   SB2069- 5 -LRB104 10276 SPS 20350 b1determine the amount of paid leave.2    (c) An employer may make available the minimum number of 3hours of paid leave, subject to pro rata requirements provided 4in subsection (b), to an employee on the first day of 5employment or the first day of the 12-month period. Employers 6that provide the minimum number of hours of paid leave to an 7employee on the first day of employment or the first day of the 812-month period are not required to carry over carryover paid 9leave from 12-month period to 12-month period and may require 10employees to use all paid leave prior to the end of the benefit 11period or forfeit the unused paid leave. However, under no 12circumstances shall an employee be credited with paid leave 13that is less than what the employee would have accrued under 14subsections (a) and (g) of this Section.15    (d) The 12-month period may be any consecutive 12-month 16period designated by the employer in writing at the time of 17hire. Changes to the 12-month period may be made by the 18employer if notice is given to employees in writing prior to 19the change and the change does not reduce the eligible accrual 20rate and paid leave available to the employee. If the employer 21changes the designated 12-month period, the employer shall 22provide the employee with documentation of the balance of 23hours worked, paid leave accrued and taken, and the remaining 24paid leave balance.25    (e) Paid leave under this Act may be taken by an employee 26for any reason of the employee's choosing. An employee is not   SB2069- 6 -LRB104 10276 SPS 20350 b1required to provide an employer a reason for the leave and may 2not be required to provide documentation or certification as 3proof or in support of the leave. An employee may choose 4whether to use paid leave provided under this Act prior to 5using any other leave provided by the employer or State law.6    (f) Employees shall be paid their hourly rate of pay for 7paid leave. However, employees engaged in an occupation in 8which gratuities or commissions have customarily and usually 9constituted and have been recognized as part of the 10remuneration for hire purposes shall be paid by their employer 11at least the full minimum wage in the jurisdiction in which 12they are employed when paid leave is taken. This wage shall be 13treated as the employee's regular rate of pay for purposes of 14this Act.15    (g) Paid leave under this Act shall begin to accrue at the 16commencement of employment or on the effective date of this 17Act, whichever is later. Employees shall be entitled to begin 18using paid leave 90 days following commencement of their 19employment or 90 days following the effective date of this 20Act, whichever is later.21    (h) Paid leave under this Act shall be provided upon the 22oral or written request of an employee in accordance with the 23employer's reasonable paid leave policy notification 24requirements which may include the following: 25        (1) If use of paid leave under this Act is 26    foreseeable, the employer may require the employee to   SB2069- 7 -LRB104 10276 SPS 20350 b1    provide 7 calendar days' notice before the date the leave 2    is to begin. 3        (2) If paid leave under this Act is not foreseeable, 4    the employee shall provide such notice as soon as is 5    practicable after the employee is aware of the necessity 6    of the leave. An employer that requires notice of paid 7    leave under this Act when the leave is not foreseeable 8    shall provide a written policy that contains procedures 9    for the employee to provide notice.10        (3) Employers shall provide employees with written 11    notice of the paid leave policy notification requirements 12    in this Section in the manner provided in Section 20 for 13    notice and posting and within 5 calendar days of any 14    change to the employer's reasonable paid leave policy 15    notification requirements. 16        (4) An employer may not require, as a condition of 17    providing paid leave under this Act, that the employee 18    search for or find a replacement worker to cover the hours 19    during which the employee takes paid leave.20    (i) Except as provided in subsection (c), paid leave under 21this Act shall carry over annually to the extent not used by 22the employee, provided that nothing in this Act shall be 23construed to require an employer to provide more than 40 hours 24of paid leave for an employee in the 12-month period unless the 25employer agrees to do so. 26    (j) Nothing in this Section or any other Illinois law or   SB2069- 8 -LRB104 10276 SPS 20350 b1rule shall be construed as requiring financial or other 2payment to an employee from an employer upon the employee's 3termination, resignation, retirement, or other separation from 4employment for paid leave accrued under this Act that has not 5been used. Nothing in this Section or any other Illinois law or 6rule shall be construed as requiring financial or other 7reimbursements to an employee from an employer for unused paid 8leave under this Act at the end of the benefit year or any 9other time. 10    (k) If an employee is transferred to a separate division, 11entity, or location, but remains employed by the same 12employer, the employee is entitled to all paid leave accrued 13at the prior division, entity, or location and is entitled to 14use all paid leave as provided in this Section. If there is a 15separation from employment and the employee is rehired within 1612 months of separation by the same employer, previously 17accrued paid leave that had not been used by the employee shall 18be reinstated. The employee shall be entitled to use accrued 19paid leave at the commencement of employment following a 20separation from employment of 12 months or less.21    (l) Paid leave under this Act shall not be charged or 22otherwise credited to an employee's paid time off bank or 23employee account unless the employer's policy permits such a 24credit. If the paid leave under this Act is credited to an 25employee's paid time off bank or employee vacation account 26then any unused paid leave shall be paid to the employee upon   SB2069- 9 -LRB104 10276 SPS 20350 b1the employee's termination, resignation, retirement, or other 2separation to the same extent as vacation time under existing 3Illinois law or rule. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to 4waive or otherwise limit an employee's right to final 5compensation for promised and earned, but unpaid vacation time 6or paid time off, as provided under the Illinois Wage Payment 7and Collection Act and rules. Employers shall provide 8employees with written notice of changes to the employer's 9vacation time, paid time off, or other paid leave policies 10that affect an employee's right to final compensation for such 11leave. 12    (m) During any period an employee takes leave under this 13Act, the employer shall maintain coverage for the employee and 14any family member under any group health plan for the duration 15of such leave at no less than the level and conditions of 16coverage that would have been provided if the employee had not 17taken the leave. The employer shall notify the employee that 18the employee is still responsible for paying the employee's 19share of the cost of the health care coverage, if any. 20    (n) Nothing in this Act shall be deemed to interfere with, 21impede, or in any way diminish the right of employees to 22bargain collectively with their employers through 23representatives of their own choosing in order to establish 24wages or other conditions of work in excess of the applicable 25minimum standards established in this Act. The paid leave 26requirements of this Act may be waived in a bona fide   SB2069- 10 -LRB104 10276 SPS 20350 b1collective bargaining agreement, but only if the waiver is set 2forth explicitly in such agreement in clear and unambiguous 3terms.4    Nothing in this Act shall be deemed to affect the validity 5or change the terms of bona fide collective bargaining 6agreements in effect on January 1, 2024. After that date, 7requirements of this Act may be waived in a bona fide 8collective bargaining agreement, but only if the waiver is set 9forth explicitly in such agreement in clear and unambiguous 10terms.11    In no event shall this Act apply to any employee working in 12the construction industry who is covered by a bona fide 13collective bargaining agreement, nor shall this Act apply to 14any employee who is covered by a bona fide collective 15bargaining agreement with an employer that provides services 16nationally and internationally of delivery, pickup, and 17transportation of parcels, documents, and freight.18    Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, nothing 19in this Act shall be deemed to affect the validity or change 20the terms of a bona fide collective bargaining agreement 21applying to an employee who is employed by a State agency that 22is in effect on July 1, 2024. After that date, requirements of 23this Act may be waived in a bona fide collective bargaining 24agreement, but only if the waiver is set forth explicitly in 25such agreement in clear and unambiguous terms. As used in this 26subsection, "State agency" has the same meaning as set forth   SB2069- 11 -LRB104 10276 SPS 20350 b1in Section 4 of the Forms Notice Act.2    (o) An agreement by an employee to waive his or her rights 3under this Act is void as against public policy.4    (p) The provisions of this Act shall not apply to any 5employer that is covered by a municipal or county ordinance 6that is in effect on the effective date of this Act that 7requires employers to give any form of paid leave to their 8employees, including paid sick leave or paid leave. 9Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, any 10employer that is not required to provide paid leave to its 11employees, including paid sick leave or paid leave, under a 12municipal or county ordinance that is in effect on the 13effective date of this Act shall be subject to the provisions 14of this Act if the employer would be required to provide paid 15leave under this Act to its employees.16    Any local ordinance that provides paid leave, including 17paid sick leave or paid leave, enacted or amended after the 18effective date of this Act must comply with the requirements 19of this Act or provide benefits, rights, and remedies that are 20greater than or equal to the benefits, rights, and remedies 21afforded under this Act.22    An employer in a municipality or county that enacts or 23amends a local ordinance that provides paid leave, including 24paid sick leave or paid leave, after the effective date of this 25Act shall only comply with the local ordinance or ordinances 26so long as the benefits, rights, and remedies are greater than   SB2069- 12 -LRB104 10276 SPS 20350 b1or equal to the benefits, rights, and remedies afforded under 2this Act.3(Source: P.A. 102-1143, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 4revised 10-23-24.) 5    (820 ILCS 192/40 new)6    Sec. 40. Exception for first responders.7    (a) A public safety agency may, in lieu of the paid leave 8provided for in Section 15, pay a first responder that is 9employed by the public safety agency the equivalent of the 10first responder's hourly rate of pay multiplied by the number 11of hours of paid leave that the first responder is entitled to 12under Section 15. A first responder is eligible for this 13payment if the first responder has been continuously employed 14by the public safety agency for at least 60 days. A payment 15under this subsection shall be paid to a first responder in its 16entirety once per calendar year.17    (b) Upon hiring a first responder, a public safety agency 18shall provide notice to the first responder of the public 19safety agency's payment-in-lieu-of-leave policy. A public 20safety agency shall provide all currently employed first 21responders with notice at least 30 days before the public 22safety agency makes a change to its payment-in-lieu-of-leave 23policy, after which the first responder shall stop accruing 24paid leave time and be entitled to the payment described in 25subsection (a). For any paid leave that a first responder has   SB2069- 13 -LRB104 10276 SPS 20350 b1accrued prior to a public safety agency's decision to change 2its payment-in-lieu-of-leave policy, the first responder shall 3have the option to either use that paid leave or convert it to 4an hourly benefit payment to be paid in addition to the base 5payment described in subsection (a).6    (c) The provisions of this Section do not affect an 7employee's eligibility for any other leave provided by State 8or federal law.